North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12A. Joint Legislative Utility Review Committee. [Repealed]

§§ 120-70.1 through 120-70.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-70.1; 1985, c. 499, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011; s. 120-70.2; 1985, c. 499, s. 1; 1991, c. 739, s. 1; 1995, c. 440, s. 1; c. 542, s. 20.5; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.3; 1985, c. 499, s. 1; 1991, c. 739, s. 2; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.4; 1985, c. 499, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.5; 1985, c. 499, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.6; 1985, c. 499, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.